Maryland, session 2026, HB1509.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Financial Institutions
11–501.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1509*

HOUSE BILL 1509
(b) “Borrower” means a person who makes a loan application for or receives a loan
or other extension of credit that is or is intended to be secured in whole or in part by any
interest in a dwelling or residential real estate located in Maryland.
(c) (1) “Dwelling” means a residential structure or mobile home that contains
one to four family housing units or individual units of condominiums or cooperatives.
(2) “Dwelling” does not include a residential structure or mobile home
unless the residential structure or mobile home, or at least one unit contained in the
residential structure or mobile home, is owner–occupied.
(o) “Mortgage servicer” means a person who:
(1) Engages in whole or in part in the business of servicing mortgage loans
for others; or
(2) Collects or otherwise receives payments on mortgage loans directly
from borrowers for distribution to any other person.
(r) “Residential real estate” means any owner–occupied real property located in
Maryland on which a dwelling is constructed or intended to be constructed.
11–517.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 11–518 of this subtitle, the
Commissioner may suspend or revoke the license of any licensee if the licensee or any
owner, director, officer, member, partner, stockholder, employee, or agent of the licensee:
(4) Violates any provision of this subtitle or any rule or regulation adopted
under it or any other law regulating mortgage loan lending in the State; or
11–522.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “INSURANCE PROCEEDS” MEANS INSURANCE PAYMENTS OR
INSURANCE CLAIM PROCEEDS ISSUED DUE TO DAMAGE TO A DWELLING OR
RESIDENTIAL REAL ESTATE.
(3) “LOSS DRAFT ACCOUNT” MEANS AN ACCOUNT IN WHICH A
MORTGAGE SERVICER HOLDS INSURANCE PROCEEDS PENDING A REPAIR OR
REBUILDING OF A DWELLING OR RESIDENTIAL REAL ESTATE THAT HAS BEEN
DAMAGED.

HOUSE BILL 1509 3
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO A MORTGAGE SERVICER THAT RECEIVES
INSURANCE PROCEEDS.
(C) (1) THE MORTGAGE SERVICER SHALL DEPOSIT THE INSURANCE
PROCEEDS INTO A LOSS DRAFT ACCOUNT IN A FEDERALLY INSURED BANKING
INSTITUTION WITH A SIMPLE INTEREST RATE OF AT LEAST 2% PER ANNUM.
(2) THE BORROWER SHALL ELECT TO HAVE THE INTEREST
EARNINGS:
(I) CREDITED TO THE LOSS DRAFT ACCOUNT; OR
(II) PAID DIRECTLY TO THE BORROWER.
(3) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, INTEREST EARNINGS ON INSURANCE PROCEEDS IN A LOSS DRAFT
ACCOUNT SHALL ACCRUE ON DEPOSIT OF THE INSURANCE PROCEEDS.
(4) IF INSURANCE PROCEEDS HAVE BEEN DEPOSITED INTO A LOSS
DRAFT ACCOUNT ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2026, INTEREST EARNINGS SHALL ACCRUE
BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026.
(D) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A MORTGAGE
SERVICER MAY CHARGE THE BORROWER A FEE FOR THE DISBURSEMENT OF THE
INTEREST EARNINGS PAID DIRECTLY TO THE BORROWER BY WIRE TRANSFER.
(2) A MORTGAGE SERVICER MAY NOT CHARGE THE BORROWER A FEE:
(I) THAT IS UNREASONABLE;
(II) THAT WOULD HAVE THE EFFECT OF LOWERING THE
INTEREST EARNINGS TO AN AMOUNT THAT WOULD EQUATE TO AN INTEREST RATE
THAT IS LESS THAN 2%;
(III) FOR THE DISBURSEMENT OF THE INTEREST EARNINGS BY
DIRECT DEPOSIT; OR
(IV) THAT EXCEEDS THE ACTUAL COSTS INCURRED BY THE
MORTGAGE SERVICER FOR THE DISBURSEMENT.
(E) (1) DISBURSEMENT METHODS OF THE INSURANCE PROCEEDS OR THE
INTEREST EARNINGS SHALL INCLUDE AT LEAST TWO OF THE FOLLOWING:

HOUSE BILL 1509
(I) WIRE TRANSFER;
(II) DIRECT DEPOSIT;
(III) CASHIER’S CHECK DELIVERED BY MAIL; OR
(IV) CERTIFIED CHECK DELIVERED BY MAIL.
(2) THE DISBURSEMENT OF THE INTEREST EARNINGS DIRECTLY TO
THE BORROWER SHALL OCCUR NOT LATER THAN 10 BUSINESS DAYS AFTER THE
MORTGAGE SERVICER RECEIVES NOTICE THAT THE BORROWER:
(I) ELECTS TO RECEIVE THE INTEREST EARNINGS DIRECTLY;
AND
(II) PROVIDES ANY INFORMATION NECESSARY FOR THE
MORTGAGE SERVICER TO COMPLETE THE DISBURSEMENT.
(3) THE MORTGAGE SERVICER MAY NOT PLACE AN UNDUE BURDEN
ON A BORROWER TO PROVIDE THE NECESSARY INFORMATION UNDER PARAGRAPH
(2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(F) (1) WITHIN 5 BUSINESS DAYS AFTER RECEIVING INSURANCE
PROCEEDS, A MORTGAGE SERVICER SHALL DEPOSIT THE INSURANCE PROCEEDS IN
A FEDERALLY INSURED BANKING INSTITUTION.
(2) WITHIN 10 BUSINESS DAYS AFTER RECEIVING INSURANCE
PROCEEDS, A MORTGAGE SERVICER SHALL NOTIFY ELECTRONICALLY OR BY MAIL
THE BORROWER OF:
(I) THE AMOUNT OF INSURANCE PROCEEDS HELD IN THE LOSS
DRAFT ACCOUNT;
(II) THE INTEREST RATE ON THE ACCOUNT;
(III) THE BORROWER’S RIGHT TO RECEIVE THE INTEREST
EARNINGS;
(IV) THE DISBURSEMENT OPTIONS;
(V) ANY APPLICABLE FEES; AND
(VI) THE TIME FRAME FOR RECEIVING THE DISBURSEMENT.

HOUSE BILL 1509 5
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.